Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-107.5 Limited license. (a)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the commissioner may
issue:

(1) A limited license to persons selling travel
tickets of a common carrier of persons or property who shall act only as to
travel ticket policies of accident and health or sickness insurance or baggage
insurance on personal effects;

(2) A limited license to each individual who has
charge of vending machines used in this State for the effectuation of travel
insurance;

(3) A limited license to any individual who sells
policies of accident and health or sickness insurance as a promotional device
to improve the circulation of a newspaper in this State; or

(4) A limited line credit insurance producer license
to any individual who sells, solicits, or negotiates limited line credit
insurance.

(b) The commissioner may prescribe and furnish
forms calling for any information that the commissioner deems proper in
connection with the application for or extension of these limited licenses.

(c) The limited license shall not be issued
until the license fee has been paid. [L 2002, c 155, pt of §3; am L 2003, c
212, §61; am L 2006, c 154, §27]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next